Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB240.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 4 of this Act:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Agriculture; and
(2) "Private entity" means an incorporated business licensed to operate in the
Commonwealth.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
It is the declared policy of the Commonwealth that ibogaine is worthy of clinical
research, trials, and studies as a potential viable therapeutic treatment of opioid
dependence and any other co-occurring mental health disorders. The purposes of
Sections 1 to 4 of this Act are to:
(1) Promote the research and study of ibogaine as a treatment of opioid dependence
and any other co-occurring mental health disorders; and
(2) Promote the creation of an industry in the Commonwealth related to the study of
ibogaine.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency fund entitled
the ibogaine research fund, to be administered by the department for the purpose
of allowing private entities that operate in the Commonwealth to partially cover
the costs of ibogaine research in the Commonwealth.
(2) The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and any
other funds both public and private. Money deposited in the fund is hereby
appropriated for purposes set out in Sections 1 to 4 of this Act.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 324
(3) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unallocated or unencumbered balances in the
fund shall be invested as provided in KRS 42.500(9), and any interest or other
income earned from the investments, along with the unallotted or unencumbered
balances in the fund, shall not lapse but shall be carried forward for into the next
fiscal year.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A private entity that applies for a distribution from the fund established in Section 3 of
this Act shall:
(1) Conduct and fund research in the Commonwealth related to:
(a) Ibogaine, including pharmaceutical development and the efficacies of
ibogaine for the treatment of opioid dependence and any other co-occurring
mental health disorders;
(b) The health effects, including the potential risks or side effects, of the use of
ibogaine; and
(c) The efficacy and potential health effects of various ibogaine delivery
methods;
(2) Review current and future ibogaine research literature, clinical studies, and
clinical trials;
(3) Monitor, to the extent that appropriate and sufficient data is available, patient
outcomes in states and countries that allow ibogaine research or usage; and
(4) Submit an application to the federal Drug Enforcement Administration to:
(a) Allow for it to conduct clinical research, trials, and studies of ibogaine as a
potential viable therapeutic treatment of opioid dependence and any other
co-occurring mental health disorders;
(b) Provide a detailed description of the planned strategy for securing an
approved "Investigation of New Drug" (IND) application from the Federal
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 324
Drug Administration (FDA). IND approval from the FDA is a prerequisite
for clinical research and trials; and
(c) Provide a detailed clinical trial design including a description of the
composition of the entity's clinical trial team by expertise, clinical trial
participant recruitment plan, detailed patient screening criteria, cardiac
safety protocols, administration protocols, aftercare, post-acute treatment
support plan, and data integrity plan.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/18/2025 11:15 AM Jacketed